District of Columbia statutes.
44-732

Asbestos abatement — Task Force established.

(a)

There is established a Task Force on Asbestos Abatement (“Task Force”).

(b)

The Task Force shall consist of 9 members appointed as follows:

(1)

Two members shall be appointed by the Mayor to represent the interests of the District of Columbia government;

(2)

Two members shall be appointed by the Board of Education to represent the interests of the District of Columbia Public Schools; and

(3)

Five members shall be appointed by the Council, 3 of whom shall have experience in the field of occupational health and safety and who shall have demonstrated a knowledge of and interest in asbestos-related diseases.

(c)

Members of the Task Force shall be appointed within 15 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays) of March 15, 1985, or within 15 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays) of November 29, 1984, whichever occurs first.

(d)

Vacancies occurring upon the Task Force shall be filled in the same manner as original appointees as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(e)

Five members of the Task Force shall constitute a quorum.

(f)

The Task Force shall study all matters relating to the presence and condition of asbestos in public buildings owned or leased by the District of Columbia and shall make recommendations to the Mayor and the Council within 120 days of November 29, 1984. The report shall outline an asbestos abatement program for the District and shall contain, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1)

A list of all public buildings owned or leased by the District of Columbia which have been constructed with asbestos materials and which pose a threat to public health and safety, or a plan for identifying these buildings;

(2)

A plan for identifying those individuals within the District of Columbia who have a high risk of asbestos-related diseases because of prolonged exposure to public buildings containing friable asbestos material;

(3)

Draft legislation to regulate individuals who are in the business of removing or containing asbestos material;

(4)

Projections on the cost of removal or containment of asbestos in public buildings and on the cost of providing screening services to persons who have been identified as having a high risk of asbestos-related disease; and

(5)

Specific recommendations on action that may be taken by the Mayor and the Council to implement a prompt and thorough abatement program.

(g)

The Task Force shall cease to exist 30 days after submission of the report required by subsection (f) of this section.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-173, § 3, 32 DCR 736
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 31, 46 DCR 2118
1981 Ed., § 32-119.2.